Maryland, session 2026, HB0608.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
1–702.
(a) (1) Subject to the provisions of § 1–701 of this subtitle, a justice or judge
shall have the salary provided in the State budget.
– 1 –

Ch. 563 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) THE CHIEF JUDGE OF THE APPELLATE COURT OF MARYLAND
AND A JUDGE WHO SERVES AS AN ADMINISTRATIVE JUDGE FOR A CIRCUIT COURT
OR THE DISTRICT COURT MAY RECEIVE AN ANNUAL STIPEND IN ADDITION TO THE
JUDGE’S ANNUAL SALARY.
(b) The Chief Judge of the District Court, during the period he THE INDIVIDUAL
serves as Chief Judge, shall have a salary equivalent to the annual salary then payable to
an associate judge of the Appellate Court of Maryland.
Article – Labor and Employment
9–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Commission” means the State Workers’ Compensation Commission.
9–304.
(b) (1) Each member of the Commission is entitled to:
(i) the salary provided in the State budget; and
(ii) reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State Travel
Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(2) The annual salary of a member of the Commission:
(i) shall at least equal the salary provided in the State budget for a
judge of the district court; and
(ii) for the Chairman, shall [be at least $1,500 more than the salary
of the other members] AT LEAST EQUAL THE SALARY OF THE CHIEF JUDGE OF THE
DISTRICT COURT.
(3) Except as provided in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, a
member of the Commission may not receive a fee or perquisite for the discharge of any duty
of office.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 2 –